Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4770.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142B.65, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Abusive head trauma training. (a) Before caring for children under school age, the director, staff persons, substitutes, and unsupervised volunteers must receive training on the risk of abusive head trauma during orientation and each calendar year thereafter. (b) Abusive head trauma training under this subdivision must be at least one-half hour in length. At a minimum, the training must address the risk factors related to shaking infants and young children, means to reduce the risk of abusive head trauma in child care, and license holder communication with parents regarding reducing the risk of abusive head trauma. (c) Except if completed during orientation, training taken under this subdivision may be used to meet the in-service training requirements under subdivision 9. (d) The commissioner shall make available for viewing a video presentation on the dangers associated with shaking infants and young children, which may be used in conjunction with the annual training required under paragraph (b). new text begin (e) The license holder must post and maintain a poster written or approved by the commissioner that contains information on the risk factors related to shaking infants and young children and means to reduce the risk of abusive head trauma. The poster must be placed in a manner that is readily accessible to the director, staff persons, substitutes, and unsupervised volunteers who work on site and in a place that is conspicuous to the people receiving services and all visitors to the facility. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027. new text end